North Carolina, session 2025, SB728.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 2J of Article 9 of Chapter 130A reads as rewritten:
"Part 2J. Management of Solar Clean Energy Equipment.
"Subpart 1. Solar Energy Equipment.
"§ 130A-309.240. Decommissioning and restoration requirements for utility-scale solar
projects; recycling of project components required; financial assurance
requirements.
…
"§ 130A-309.243. Enforcement and appeals.
…. "
SECTION 2. Part 2J of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new Subpart:
"Subpart 2. Utility-Scale Battery Energy Storage.
"§ 130A-309.250 Permitting, emergency response planning, decommissioning and
restoration, and financial assurance requirements for utility-scale battery
energy storage systems.
(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this Part, the following definitions apply:
(1) Energy storage. – Any technology that is capable of absorbing electricity,
storing the electricity for a period of time, and redelivering the electricity.
(2) Battery energy storage system. – Electrochemical devices that charge, or
collect, energy from the grid or a generation facility, store that energy, and
then discharge that energy at a later time to provide electricity or other grid
services.
(3) Utility-scale battery energy storage system. – Battery energy storage systems
with a rated nameplate capacity of equal to or greater than 1,000 kilowatts (1
megawatt).
(b) Permit Required. – No person may install or operate utility-scale battery energy
storage system in the State without first having obtained a permit from the Department of
Environmental Quality pursuant to this section. The Department shall hold at least one public
*S728-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
meeting on a permit application in the county in which the battery energy storage system is
proposed to be located. In order to obtain a permit pursuant to this section, the owner of a
proposed system shall submit all of the following to the Commission:
(1) A description of the location of the proposed system.
(2) A description of the type of battery energy storage equipment to be used at the
proposed system.
(3) A statement identifying the fire department and law enforcement entities that
may reasonably be expected to be the primary first responders to a fire at the
location of the battery energy storage system.
(4) An Emergency Response Plan as required by subsection (c) of this section.
(5) A Decommissioning Plan as required by subsection (d) of this section.
(6) Documentation of financial assurance as required by subsection (e) of this
section.
(c) Emergency Response Plan. – The owner of a utility-scale battery energy storage
system located in the State shall develop and maintain an emergency response and evacuation
plan that covers the premises of the system, which shall be submitted to the Department of
Environmental Quality. In developing the plan, the owner of a battery energy storage system
shall coordinate with local emergency management officials. The emergency response and
evacuation plan shall do all of the following:
(1) Establish response procedures for an equipment malfunction or failure.
(2) Include procedures that provide for the safety of surrounding residents,
neighboring properties, emergency responders, and the environment.
(3) Establish notification, communication, and coordination procedures between
the battery energy storage system and local emergency management officials.
(4) Consider actions to be taken to address potential offsite impacts, including
poor air quality, and threats to municipal water supplies and surface and
groundwater sources.
(5) Include procedures for establishing shelter-in-place orders and road closure
notifications when appropriate.
(d) Decommissioning Requirement, Plan, and Financial Assurance. –
(1) The owner of a utility-scale battery energy storage system shall be responsible
for proper decommissioning of the system upon cessation of operations and
restoration of the property in compliance with subdivision (3) of this
subsection, including all costs associated therewith, no later than one year
following cessation of operations. The owner shall notify the Department
within 30 days of cessation of operations, which notice shall include a detailed
description of the steps to be taken to properly decommission the system and
for restoration of the site. At a minimum, an owner shall take all of the
following steps in decommissioning a system:
a. Disconnect the utility scale battery energy storage system from the
power grid.
b. Remove all equipment from the battery energy storage system, and
collect and ship equipment for reuse, or recycle all of the components
thereof practicably capable of being recycled, including energy
storage system batteries; aboveground electrical interconnection and
distribution cables that are no longer deemed necessary; subsurface
cable no longer deemed necessary; any metal fencing; and electrical
and electronic devices, including transformers and inverters.
Components that will not be shipped for reuse, are incapable of being
recycled, and do not meet the definition of hazardous waste shall be
properly disposed of in (i) an industrial landfill or (ii) a municipal solid
Page 2 Senate Bill 728-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
waste landfill. Energy storage system batteries that meet the definition
of a hazardous waste shall comply with hazardous waste requirements
for recycling and disposal as applicable.
c. Restore the property (i) as nearly as practicable to its condition before
the battery energy storage system was sited or (ii) to an alternative
condition agreed upon in a written contract or lease agreement
between the landowner and the system owner. A copy of the
agreement signed by both parties shall be provided to the Department
prior to decommissioning. The condition of the property shall
otherwise comply with any applicable statutory requirements, rules
adopted thereunder, and requirements in local ordinance. Land that
was cleared of trees for the battery energy storage system may be
revegetated or reforested with seedlings.
(2) The owner of a utility-scale battery energy storage system shall submit a
decommissioning plan to the Department for approval, which shall be
prepared, signed, and sealed by a professional engineer licensed in the State
and shall contain all of the following information:
a. The name, address, and contact information for the owner of the
system, and name, address, and contact information for the landowner
of the property on which the system is to be located sited, if different
than the owner.
b. A narrative description of how the decommissioning will be
conducted, including the decommissioning sequencing; the
disposition of materials to be used upon decommissioning, such as
landfilling, reuse, or recycling of system equipment, which shall
specifically delineate methods to be used for solid and hazardous
waste; and a schedule for completion of the decommissioning
activities.
c. Information on equipment proposed to be salvaged, including
estimated salvage value of the equipment for the purpose of
determining financial assurance.
d. Information on steps to be taken to restore the property in compliance
with subdivision (1) of this subsection.
e. A cost estimate for decommissioning the system and restoration of the
property in compliance with subdivision (1) of this subsection.
f. The proposed mechanism to satisfy the financial assurance
requirements established under subdivision (3) of this subsection,
including information on which legal entity will establish the
mechanism, when it will be established in accordance with the
requirements of this section, and how the Department will access the
funds from the mechanism if needed.
(3) The owner of a utility-scale battery energy storage system shall establish
financial assurance in an amount acceptable to the Department that will ensure
that sufficient funds are available for decommissioning of the system and
restoration of the property in compliance with subdivision (1) of this
subsection, even if the owner becomes insolvent or ceases to reside in, be
incorporated, do business, or maintain assets in the State. To establish
sufficient availability of funds under this section, the owner of a battery energy
storage system may use insurance, financial tests, third party guarantees by
persons who can pass the financial test, guarantees by corporate parents who
can pass the financial test, irrevocable letters of credit, trusts, surety bonds, or
Senate Bill 728-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
any other financial device, or any combination of the foregoing, shown to
provide protection equivalent to the financial protection that would be
provided by insurance if insurance were the only mechanism used. Financial
assurance shall be established by an owner of a battery energy storage system
and maintained until such time as the system is decommissioned and
restoration of the property has been completed in compliance with this section.
Documentation of financial assurance established shall be submitted to the
Department at the time a permit application is submitted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(h) Fees. – The Department shall collect fees from the owner of a utility-scale battery
energy storage system subject to the requirements of this section at the time a permit application
is submitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. Fees collected under this subsection shall
be applied to the Department's cost of administering the program.
(i) Department Report. – Information regarding implementation of the requirements of
this section shall be included in the annual report required under G.S. 130A-309.06(c).
(j) Rules Required. – The Department of Environmental Quality shall adopt rules
establishing criteria for all of the following:
(1) Siting requirements for utility-scale battery energy storage systems to
reasonably ensure that: (i) a proposed system is sited at sufficient distance
from other battery energy storage systems in order to mitigate the risk of fire
at a system, or the spread of a fire between systems; (ii) in the event of a fire
at the system, the fire will not block the only access point to a residential area.
(2) Set the amount of financial assurance required for utility-scale battery energy
storage systems as set forth in subsection (d) of this section. These rules shall
consider, at a minimum, the battery storage technology to be employed; the
approximate number and size of batteries to be located at the system; any
ancillary facilities to constructed in association with the system; the condition
of the property prior to construction of a battery energy storage system; the
amount of acreage that would be impacted by the proposed system; and any
other factors designed to enable establishment of adequate financial assurance
for decommissioning and restoration on a site-by-site basis. In establishing
requirements for financial assurance for a battery energy storage system, the
Department shall consider the salvage value of the system's equipment. The
rules shall require periodic updates to be provided by owners with respect to
financial assurance maintained. In addition, the Department shall adopt rules
as necessary to implement other requirements of this section, including rules
to address the following matters:
(3) Requirements for decommissioning plans, including required information,
and processes for submittal and review of plans.
(4) Permit fees to be assessed.
(5) Any other matter the Department deems necessary.
"§ 130A-309.251. Utility-Scale Battery Energy Storage Management Fund.
(a) Creation. – The Utility-Scale Battery Energy Management Fund is created as a special
fund within the Department. The Fund consists of revenue credited to the Fund from the proceeds
of the fee imposed on owners of utility-scale battery energy storage systems under
G.S. 130A-309.250.
(b) Use and Distribution. – Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the Department to
implement the provisions of this Subpart concerning proper decommissioning of utility-scale
battery energy storage facilities.
"§ 130A-309.252. Enforcement and appeals.
(a) This Subpart may be enforced as provided by Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter.
Page 4 Senate Bill 728-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Appeals concerning the enforcement of rules, the imposition of administrative
penalties, or any other action taken by the Department under authority of this Subpart shall be
governed by the provisions for appeals set forth in Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law, and applies to utility-scale
battery energy storage systems for which construction is commenced on or after that date.
Senate Bill 728-First Edition Page 5